Nebraska, session 109, LB1043.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1043 LB1043
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-954, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
68-954 (1) The department and the pharmaceutical and therapeutics
committee shall consider all therapeutic classes of prescription drugs
for inclusion on the preferred drug list , except that antidepressant,
antipsychotic, and anticonvulsant prescription drugs shall not be subject
to consideration for inclusion on the preferred drug list.
(2)(a) The department shall include a prescription drug on the
preferred drug list if the prescription drug is therapeutically
equivalent to or superior to a prescription drug on the list and the net
cost of the new prescription drug is equal to or less than the net cost
of the listed drug, after consideration of applicable rebates or
discounts negotiated by the department.
(b) If the department finds that two or more prescription drugs
under consideration for inclusion on the preferred drug list are
therapeutically equivalent, the department shall include the more cost-
effective prescription drug or drugs on the preferred drug list, after
consideration of applicable rebates or discounts negotiated by the
department.
(3) The department shall maintain an updated preferred drug list in
electronic format and shall make the list available to the public on the
department's Internet website.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-954, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-